Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1278
Certificate of title; application; contents; issuance; transfer of motorboat.

(1) Application for a certificate of title shall be presented to the county treasurer, shall be made upon a form prescribed by the Department of Motor Vehicles, and shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed in section 37-1287. The owner of a motorboat for which a certificate of title is required shall obtain a certificate of title prior to registration required under section 37-1214. The buyer of a motorboat sold pursuant to section 76-1607 shall present documentation that such sale was completed in compliance with such section.

(2)(a) If a certificate of title has previously been issued for the motorboat in this state, the application for a new certificate of title shall be accompanied by the certificate of title duly assigned. If a certificate of title has not previously been issued for the motorboat in this state, the application shall be accompanied by a certificate of number from this state, a manufacturer's or importer's certificate, a duly certified copy thereof, proof of purchase from a governmental agency or political subdivision, a certificate of title from another state, or a court order issued by a court of record, a manufacturer's certificate of origin, or an assigned registration certificate, if the motorboat was brought into this state from a state which does not have a certificate of title law. The county treasurer shall retain the evidence of title presented by the applicant on which the certificate of title is issued. When the evidence of title presented by the applicant is a certificate of title or an assigned registration certificate issued by another state, the department shall notify the state of prior issuance that the certificate has been surrendered. If a certificate of title has not previously been issued for the motorboat in this state and the applicant is unable to provide such documentation, the applicant may apply for a bonded certificate of title as prescribed in section 37-1278.01.

(b) This subdivision applies beginning on an implementation date designated by the Director of Motor Vehicles. The director shall designate an implementation date which is on or before January 1, 2021. In addition to the information required under subdivision (2)(a) of this section, the application for a certificate of title shall contain (i)(A) the full legal name as defined in section 60-468.01 of each owner or (B) the name of each owner as such name appears on the owner's motor vehicle operator's license or state identification card and (ii)(A) the motor vehicle operator's license number or state identification card number of each owner, if applicable, and one or more of the identification elements as listed in section 60-484 of each owner, if applicable, and (B) if any owner is a business entity, a nonprofit organization, an estate, a trust, or a church-controlled organization, its tax identification number.

(3) The county treasurer shall use reasonable diligence in ascertaining whether or not the statements in the application for a certificate of title are true by checking the application and documents accompanying the same with the records of motorboats in his or her office. If he or she is satisfied that the applicant is the owner of the motorboat and that the application is in the proper form, the county treasurer shall issue a certificate of title over his or her signature and sealed with his or her seal.

(4)(a) In the case of the sale of a motorboat, the certificate of title shall be obtained in the name of the purchaser upon application signed by the purchaser, except that for titles to be held by a married couple, applications may be accepted by the county treasurer upon the signature of either spouse as a signature for himself or herself and as an agent for his or her spouse.

(b) This subdivision applies beginning on an implementation date designated by the Director of Motor Vehicles. The director shall designate an implementation date which is on or before January 1, 2021. If the purchaser of a motorboat does not apply for a certificate of title in accordance with subdivision (4)(a) of this section within thirty days after the sale of the motorboat, the seller of such motorboat may request the department to update the electronic certificate of title record to reflect the sale. The department shall update such record upon receiving evidence of a sale satisfactory to the director.

(5) In all cases of transfers of motorboats, the application for a certificate of title shall be filed within thirty days after the delivery of the motorboat. A dealer need not apply for a certificate of title for a motorboat in stock or acquired for stock purposes, but upon transfer of a motorboat in stock or acquired for stock purposes, the dealer shall give the transferee a reassignment of the certificate of title on the motorboat or an assignment of a manufacturer's or importer's certificate. If all reassignments printed on the certificate of title have been used, the dealer shall obtain title in his or her name prior to any subsequent transfer.

Laws 1994, LB 123, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 1317, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 15;

Laws 2015, LB642, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB492, § 10;

Laws 2019, LB111, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB270, § 2.

Certificate of title, negligent execution by government employee, see sections 13-910 and 81-8,219.